Illinois, session 104th, HB1260.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Taxi Safety Act of 2007 is amended by 5changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 55/5)7    Sec. 5. Requirements for the operation of taxicabs. 8    (a) The taxi driver's picture, the taxi driver's license 9or registration number, and the taxicab medallion number or an 10exterior identification number must be posted in a visible 11location in each cab.12    (b) There must be posted in a visible location in each 13taxicab a telephone number for a passenger to call if the taxi 14driver is operating the taxicab in a reckless manner.15    (c) If a taxi driver collides with a pedestrian while 16operating a taxicab, resulting in bodily injury, then any 17responding law enforcement officers must test the taxi driver 18for drug and alcohol use.19    (d) The taxi driver shall complete the human trafficking 20recognition training program published by the Department of 21Human Services as described in the Human Trafficking 22Recognition Training Act.23(Source: P.A. 95-598, eff. 6-1-08.)   HB1260- 2 -LRB104 05895 SPS 15926 b1    Section 10. The Lodging Services Human Trafficking 2Recognition Training Act is amended by changing Sections 1, 5, 310, and 15 as follows: 4    (820 ILCS 95/1)5    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Lodging 6Services Human Trafficking Recognition Training Act.7(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 6-20-19; 101-499, eff. 8-23-19.) 8    (820 ILCS 95/5)9    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:10    "Bar" means an establishment that is devoted to the 11serving of alcoholic beverages for consumption by guests on 12the premises and that derives no more than 10% of its gross 13revenue from the sale of food consumed on the premises. "Bar" 14includes, but is not limited to, taverns, nightclubs, cocktail 15lounges, adult entertainment facilities, and cabarets.16    "Barber shop" means an establishment classified as a 17barber shop in the 2022 North American Industry Classification 18System under code 812111.19    "Beauty salon" means an establishment classified as a 20beauty salon or a salon in the 2022 North American Industry 21Classification System under code 812112.22    "Department" means the Department of Human Services.23    "Employee" means a person employed by a lodging   HB1260- 3 -LRB104 05895 SPS 15926 b1establishment, restaurant, truck stop, bar, barber shop, 2beauty salon, or school. "Employee" has the same application 3and meaning as that provided in Sections 1 and 2 of the 4Illinois Wage Payment and Collection Act who has recurring 5interactions with the public, including, but not limited to, 6an employee who works in a reception area, performs 7housekeeping duties, helps customers in moving their 8possessions, or transports by vehicle customers of the lodging 9establishment.10    "Human trafficking" means the deprivation or violation of 11the personal liberty of another with the intent to obtain 12forced labor or services, procure or sell the individual for 13commercial sex, or exploit the individual in obscene matter. 14Depriving or violating a person's liberty includes substantial 15and sustained restriction of another's liberty accomplished 16through fraud, deceit, coercion, violence, duress, menace, or 17threat of unlawful injury to the victim or to another person, 18under circumstances where the person receiving or apprehending 19the threat reasonably believes that it is likely that the 20person making the threat would carry it out. 21    "Lodging establishment" means an establishment classified 22as a hotel or motel in the 2017 North American Industry 23Classification System under code 721110, and an establishment 24classified as a casino hotel in the 2017 North American 25Industry Classification System under code 721120.26    "Restaurant" means any business that is primarily engaged   HB1260- 4 -LRB104 05895 SPS 15926 b1in the sale of ready-to-eat food for immediate consumption 2comprising at least 51% of the total sales, excluding the sale 3of liquor.4    "School" means any public or private elementary or 5secondary school, including a charter school.6    "Truck stop" means an establishment intended to provide 7services to the trucking industry, including, but not limited 8to, selling fuel and food, providing showers, offering repair 9services, and offering ample room where drivers of long-haul 10trucks can park and rest. 11(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 6-20-19; 101-499, eff. 8-23-19; 12102-324, eff. 1-1-22.) 13    (820 ILCS 95/10)14    Sec. 10. Human trafficking recognition training. Beginning 15June 1, 2020, a lodging establishment, restaurant, or truck 16stop, bar, barber shop, beauty salon, or school shall provide 17its employees with training in the recognition of human 18trafficking and protocols for reporting observed human 19trafficking to the appropriate authority. The employees must 20complete the training within 6 months after beginning 21employment in such role with the lodging establishment and 22every 2 years thereafter, if still employed by the lodging 23establishment. The training shall be at least 20 minutes in 24duration.25(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 6-20-19; 101-499, eff. 8-23-19;   HB1260- 5 -LRB104 05895 SPS 15926 b1102-324, eff. 1-1-22.) 2    (820 ILCS 95/15)3    Sec. 15. Human trafficking recognition training 4curriculum. 5    (a) A lodging establishment, restaurant, truck stop, bar, 6barber shop, beauty salon, or school may use its own human 7trafficking training program or that of a third party and be in 8full compliance with this Act if the human trafficking 9training program includes, at a minimum, all of the following: 10        (1) a definition of human trafficking and commercial 11    exploitation of children;12        (2) guidance on how to identify individuals who are 13    most at risk for human trafficking;14        (3) the difference between human trafficking for 15    purposes of labor and for purposes of sex as the 16    trafficking relates to lodging establishments, 17    restaurants, truck stops, bars, barber shops, beauty 18    salons, or schools; and19        (4) guidance on the role of lodging establishment 20    employees in reporting and responding to instances of 21    human trafficking.22    (b) The Department shall develop a curriculum for an 23approved human trafficking training recognition program which 24shall be used by a lodging establishment, restaurant, truck 25stop, bar, barber shop, beauty salon, or school that does not   HB1260- 6 -LRB104 05895 SPS 15926 b1administer its own human trafficking recognition program as 2described in subsection (a). The human trafficking training 3recognition program developed by the Department shall include, 4at a minimum, all of the following: 5        (1) a definition of human trafficking and commercial 6    exploitation of children;7        (2) guidance on how to identify individuals who are 8    most at risk for human trafficking;9        (3) the difference between human trafficking for 10    purposes of labor and for purposes of sex as the 11    trafficking relates to lodging establishments, 12    restaurants, truck stops, bars, barber shops, beauty 13    salons, or schools; and14        (4) guidance on the role of lodging establishment, 15    restaurant, truck stop, bar, barber shop, beauty salon, or 16    school employees in reporting and responding to instances 17    of human trafficking.18    The Department may consult the United States Department of 19Justice, United States Department of Commerce, or the United 20States Department of Education for the human trafficking 21recognition training program developed under this subsection.22    The Department shall develop and publish the human 23trafficking recognition training program described in this 24subsection no later than July 1, 2020.25(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 6-20-19; 101-499, eff. 8-23-19.)